Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1710.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1103.1(g.1), 1301(c.1) and 1307(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 1103.1. Application for certificate of title.1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 * * *(g.1) Verification.--In lieu of notarization of any document required to be submitted with the application for certificate of title, the department shall accept the verification of a person's signature by a wholesale vehicle auction licensed by the State Board of Vehicle Manufacturers, Dealers and Salespersons or its employee, or an issuing agent who is licensed as a vehicle dealer by the State Board of Vehicle Manufacturers, Dealers and Salespersons, or its employee. The name and identification number and the signature of the issuing agent or wholesale vehicle auction or respective employee shall be written in the space reserved for a notarization or verification. If an issuing agent or wholesale vehicle auction or respective employee falsely verifies a person's signature, the department shall suspend the issuing agent's or wholesale vehicle auction's authority to issue [temporary] registration plates and cards for not less than 30 days. When verification is used in lieu of notarization, the issuing agent or its employee shall verify a person's identity by using at least one form of government-issued photo identification. A copy of the form of identification used shall be maintained by the issuing agent for a period of three years from the date of the verification.* * *§ 1301. Registration and certificate of title required.* * *(c.1) Reconstructed, recovered theft, flood, modified and specially constructed vehicles.--Only the department shall issue a [temporary] registration plate or card, or permit the transfer of a registration plate, in conjunction with any application for reconstructed, recovered theft, flood, modified and specially 20250HB1710PN2103 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constructed vehicles. Proof of financial responsibility must accompany the application for registration prior to the issuance of a registration plate.* * *§ 1307. Period of registration.* * *(b) New registration.--A new registration is effective on the date of issuance of a registration card by the department [or the date of issuance of a temporary registration card by an authorized agent of the department under section 1310 (relating to temporary registration cards)].* * *Section 2. Sections 1310 and 1310.1 of Title 75 are repealed:[§ 1310. Temporary registration cards.(a) General rule.--The department shall provide temporary registration cards for use pending issuance or transfer of permanent registration cards. Temporary registration cards and plates may be delivered to designated agents who shall have the authority to issue them in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department. When determining whether to suspend, revoke or impose a monetary penalty upon an agent, the department may consider relevant mitigating events.(b) Duration.--Temporary registration cards shall be valid for such period as the department shall designate. Temporary registration cards issued to a vehicle acquired in this Commonwealth for transportation to another state for registration or use in the other state shall be valid for 60 days from the date of issuance.(c) Charges by designated agent.--A designated agent may not 20250HB1710PN2103 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charge any fee for issuing a temporary registration card other than notary fees.§ 1310.1. Temporary registration permits.(a) General rule.--A registration permit shall be issued to the registrant concurrent with the issuance of a temporary registration card and plate.(b) Content of registration permit.--Every registration permit shall contain the following information:(1) The term "Pennsylvania" preprinted on the permit.(2) The term "temporary registration permit" preprinted on the permit.(3) The sticker issued by the department which will contain the number of the temporary registration plate and the dealer identification number (DIN).(4) The expiration date (month/day/year) of the temporary registration plate handprinted on the permit in permanent black marker.(5) The control number preprinted on the permit.(c) Location of registration permit.--Except as otherwise provided, a registration permit shall be affixed to the extreme lower left-hand (driver side) inside corner of the rear window of a vehicle with the printed information visible from the outside. On trailers, motorcycles, mopeds, motor-driven cycles and convertibles, the registration permit shall be carried with the vehicle at all times while the vehicle is being operated on the highway.]Section 3. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1310.2. Transition from temporary registration cards, permits and plates.The department shall take the necessary steps to end all 20250HB1710PN2103 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 processes regarding the issuance of temporary registration cards, permits and plates and develop an expedited process for issuing permanent registration cards and plates within two years of the effective date of this section. The department shall provide only permanent registration cards and plates as provided by this title.Section 4. Sections 1314(b), 1318(a), 1331(c), (d) and (e), 1786(h)(3), 1928, 2307(b), 6150 and 7504.1(a), (b) and (c) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1314. Transfer of registration.* * *(b) Procedure for transfer.--In order to transfer registration and registration plates, the transferee shall apply for [a temporary registration card in accordance with section 1310 (relating to temporary registration cards) and simultaneously apply for] transfer of registration under this section.* * *§ 1318. Duties of agents.(a) Verification of financial responsibility.--An agent of the Department of Transportation who is authorized to issue on behalf of the department a vehicle registration renewal or [temporary] registration shall be required to verify financial responsibility prior to issuance.* * *§ 1331. Issuance and reissuance of registration plates.* * *[(c) Temporary registration plates.--The department shall provide temporary registration plates for use on vehicles which are to be removed from this Commonwealth or for use as necessary 20250HB1710PN2103 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pending issuance of permanent registration plates.](d) Reflectorizing material on plate.--All registration plates[, except temporary plates,] shall be treated with reflectorizing material in accordance with standards approved by the department.(e) Issuance of plates by agents.--The department may deliver registration plates, other than special plates, to designated agents, who shall have the authority to issue them [in conjunction with the issuance of temporary registration cards].* * *§ 1786. Required financial responsibility.* * * (h) Reinstatement of voluntarily surrendered registration plate and card.--* * *(3) A full agent designated by the department to issue [substitute temporary] registration cards and plates following a voluntary surrender of registration cards and plates pursuant to regulations promulgated by the department or a decentralized service agent appointed by the department may be authorized to issue [substitute temporary] registration plates provided proof of financial responsibility and a copy of the receipt showing the original registration plate and card were voluntarily surrendered are furnished. The fees provided pursuant to sections 1929 (relating to replacement registration plates) and 1932 (relating to duplicate registration cards) shall not be charged if the original registration plate and card were canceled pursuant to paragraph (1).20250HB1710PN2103 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1928. [Temporary and electronically] Electronically issued registration plates.The fee payable by a dealer or other dispensing agent for a [temporary registration plate or for a] registration plate to be issued for new registration processed electronically with the department shall be $14. The charge of the agent for providing an applicant with a plate under this section shall not exceed a total of $14.§ 2307. Enforcement.* * *(b) Administrative penalties.--The department and the Department of State may suspend the license and recall motor vehicle dealer plates and the authority to issue [temporary] registrations of any member who does not pay the requisite fee to the fund prior to acting as a member. The suspension and recall shall remain in effect until the requisite fee is paid, plus an additional 30 days.§ 6150. Proportional registration not exclusive.Nothing contained in this subchapter relating to proportional registration of fleet vehicles shall be construed as requiring any vehicle to be proportionally registered if the vehicle is otherwise registered in this Commonwealth for the operation in which it is engaged including, but not by way of limitation, [regular] registration, [temporary registration,] or trip permit or registration.§ 7504.1. Agent duties and responsibilities.(a) General rule.--An agent shall faithfully abide by and comply with all laws pertaining to the issuance of [temporary] registration plates and cards.(b) Return or surrender of [temporary] registration cards 20250HB1710PN2103 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and plates.--(1) An agent who discontinues the business shall, within five days of discontinuance, return to the department all [temporary] registration cards and plates in the agent's possession. The department shall make appropriate refunds under paragraph (3).(2) An agent whose contract has been terminated shall surrender all registration cards and plates in the agent's possession as directed by the department or its designee.(3) The fee paid by an agent for a [temporary] registration plate shall be refunded to the agent upon the return of the plate if the plate is accompanied by the appropriate form provided by the department except when the contract to operate as an agent is terminated. The department shall deduct $25 from the refund to cover processing of the request for refund.(c) Seizure of registration plates.--Designated department employees and designees of the department may seize [temporary] registration plates and related documents from a messenger or agent who does not have a contract with the department to provide agent services.* * *Section 5. Section 9024(b) of Title 75, added July 17, 2024 (P.L.917, No.85), is amended to read:§ 9024. Electric vehicle road user charge.* * *(b) New [or temporary] vehicle registration.--New [or temporary] registration for an electric vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle issued on or after the effective date of this subsection shall be subject to the electric vehicle road 20250HB1710PN2103 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 user charge imposed under subsection (a). The Department of Transportation shall send a form to the owner or registrant for the payment of the electric vehicle road user charge for the initial registration consistent with Chapter 13.* * *Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1710PN2103 - 9 - 123456